Washington statutes.
RCW 19.270.060

Who may bring an action—Damages—Attorneys' fees—Limit of damages.

(1) In addition to any other remedies provided by this chapter or any other provision of law, the attorney general, or a provider of computer software or owner of a website or trademark who is adversely affected by reason of a violation of this chapter, and whose action arises directly out of such person's status as a provider or owner, may bring an action against a person who violates this chapter to enjoin further violations and to recover either actual damages or one hundred thousand dollars per violation, whichever is greater.

(2) In an action under subsection (1) of this section, a court may increase the damages up to three times the damages allowed under subsection (1) of this section if the defendant has engaged in a pattern and practice of violating this chapter. The court may also award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing party.

(3) The amount of damages determined under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may not exceed two million dollars.

[ 2008 c 66 s 5; 2005 c 500 s 6.]